Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 10
SOLID WASTES DISPOSAL LIMITATIONS

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2005 act enacting this part 10, see section 1 of chapter 285, Session Laws of Colorado 2005.

30-20-1001. Definitions.

As used in this part 10, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Consumer product" means any device that is primarily intended for personal or household use and is typically sold, distributed, or made available to the general population through retail or mail-order distribution. Such term does not include vehicles, motorcycles, wheelchairs, boats, or other forms of motive power. The term does include, but is not limited to, computers, games, telephones, radios, and similar electronic devices.

"De minimis quantities of used oil" means small spills, leaks, or drippings from pumps, machinery, pipes, and other similar equipment during normal operations; except that the term shall not include used oil discarded as a result of abnormal operations resulting in substantial leaks, spills, or other releases.

"Land disposal" means placing, discarding, or otherwise disposing of residentially generated solid wastes:

In any solid wastes disposal site and facility, transfer station, or treatment, storage, or disposal facility operated by the state, a local government, or a private entity;

In sewers, drainage systems, septic tanks, surface or groundwaters, watercourses, or any body of water; or

On the ground.

"Lead-acid battery" means a battery that:

Consists of lead and sulfuric acid;

Is used as a power source; and

Is not intended as a power source for consumer products.

"Lubricating oil" means the fraction of crude oil or synthetic oil used to reduce friction in motorized equipment. "Lubricating oil" includes rerefined oil.

"Person" means an individual.

"Person" shall not include waste haulers as defined in subsection (16) of this section.

"Residentially generated" means used lead-acid batteries and used oil generated by a person.

"Retailer" means any corporation, limited liability company, partnership, individual, sole proprietorship, joint-stock company, joint venture, or other private legal entity that engages in the sale of new lead-acid batteries or lubricating oil directly to the end user.

"Solid waste" shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 30-20-101 (6).

"Solid wastes disposal" shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 30-20-101 (7).

"Solid wastes disposal site and facility" shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 30-20-101 (8).

Repealed.

"Transfer station" shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 30-20-101 (9).

"Used lead-acid battery" means any lead-acid battery that is no longer functional or no longer used for its primary purpose.

"Used oil" means any residentially generated motor oil, refined from crude oil or a synthetic oil, that has been used and as a result of that use is contaminated by physical or chemical impurities.

"Waste hauler" means any individual or any employee or agent of a partnership, private, county, or municipal corporation, firm, board of a metropolitan district, or other association of persons that haul waste under contract, agreement, or as otherwise provided by law, to solid wastes disposal sites and facilities.

Repealed.

"Wholesaler" means any corporation, limited liability company, partnership, individual, sole proprietorship, joint-stock company, joint venture, or other private legal entity that sells new lead-acid batteries or lubricating oil for resale.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire part added, p. 1251, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2010:

(17) amended, (HB 10-1018), ch. 421, p. 2180, § 13, effective June 10.

L. 2014:

(7), (8), and (19) amended and (12), (17), and (18) repealed, (HB 14-1352), ch. 351, p. 1594, § 7, effective July 1.

30-20-1002. Lead-acid batteries - disposal limitations.

On and after July 1, 2007, land disposal of residentially generated used lead-acid batteries shall be prohibited.

A person shall dispose of used lead-acid batteries by delivering the batteries to:

A retailer or wholesaler engaged in lead-acid battery collection or recycling;

A secondary lead smelter; or

A collection or recycling facility operating under the laws of this state or under rules promulgated by the United States environmental protection agency.

A retailer shall dispose of used lead-acid batteries by delivering the batteries to:

The agent of a wholesaler or a secondary lead smelter;

A battery manufacturer for delivery to a secondary lead smelter; or

A collection or recycling facility operating under the laws of this state or under rules promulgated by the United States environmental protection agency.

Waste haulers shall notify customers that the land disposal of lead-acid batteries is prohibited.

The notice required by paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) shall explain that lead-acid batteries shall be disposed of by delivery to a retailer or wholesaler engaged in lead-acid battery collection or recycling, a secondary lead smelter, or a collection or recycling facility operating under the laws of this state or under rules promulgated by the United States environmental protection agency.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire part added, p. 1253, § 2, effective August 8.

30-20-1003. Lead-acid batteries - collection for recycling.

A retailer selling replacement lead-acid batteries in the state may:

Accept from customers, at the point of transfer, used lead-acid batteries of the same general type and in a quantity at least equal to the number of new batteries purchased, if offered by customers; and

Collect a deposit of at least ten dollars on the sale of an automotive-type replacement lead-acid battery that is not accompanied by the return of a used lead-acid battery of the same general type. All deposits shall inure to the benefit of the retailer unless the person paying the deposit pursuant to this subsection (1) returns a used automotive lead-acid battery to the retailer within thirty days of the date of sale, in which case the deposit shall be returned to the customer.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire part added, p. 1254, § 2, effective August 8.

30-20-1004. Lead-acid battery wholesalers.

Any wholesaler selling replacement lead-acid batteries may accept from customers at the point of transfer used lead-acid batteries of the same general type and in a quantity at least equal to the number of new batteries purchased, if offered by customers.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire part added, p. 1254, § 2, effective August 8.

30-20-1005. Used oil disposal limitations.

On and after July 1, 2007, land disposal of residentially generated used oil shall be prohibited.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, a person may dispose of an item or substance that contains de minimis quantities of used oil in a solid wastes disposal site and facility under subsection (1) of this section if:

To the extent reasonably possible, all oil has been removed from the item or substance; and

No free-flowing oil remains in the item or substance.

A person shall dispose of used oil by delivery to:

A retailer or wholesaler engaged in used oil collection or recycling; or

A collection or recycling facility operating under the laws of this state or under rules promulgated by the United States environmental protection agency.

A retailer shall dispose of used oil by delivery to the agent of a wholesaler or to a collection or recycling facility operating under the laws of this state or under rules promulgated by the United States environmental protection agency.

Every quart of improperly disposed oil shall constitute a separate violation.

Waste haulers shall notify customers that the land disposal of used oil is prohibited.

The notice required in paragraph (a) of this subsection (6) shall explain that used oil shall be disposed of by delivery to a retailer or wholesaler engaged in used oil collection or recycling or a collection or recycling facility operating under the laws of this state or under rules promulgated by the United States environmental protection agency.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire part added, p. 1254, § 2, effective August 8.

30-20-1006. Limitations on the disposal of tires. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire part added, p. 1255, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2009:

(2) amended, (SB 09-289), ch. 314, p. 1700, § 4, effective August 5.

L. 2014:

Entire section repealed, (HB 14-1352), ch. 351, p. 1596, § 13, effective July 1.

30-20-1007. Waste tires - collection for recycling. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire part added, p. 1256, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-289), ch. 314, p. 1700, § 5, effective August 5.

L. 2014:

Entire section repealed, (HB 14-1352), ch. 351, p. 1596, § 13, effective July 1.

30-20-1008. Tire wholesalers. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire part added, p. 1256, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2014:

Entire section repealed, (HB 14-1352), ch. 351, p. 1596, § 13, effective July 1.

30-20-1009. Inspection - enforcement - nuisances - violations - civil penalty.

The inspection, enforcement, nuisance, violation, and civil penalty provisions in section 30-20-113 shall apply to this part 10.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section and section 30-20-1010, if a person is able to establish that due diligence has been conducted and no reasonable options for recycling the solid wastes are available, then the person may dispose of the solid wastes in a solid wastes disposal site and facility or transfer station.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section and sections 30-20-1010 and 30-20-113 (1)(c), any solid wastes disposal site and facility in substantial compliance with its waste characterization plan developed pursuant to section 30-20-110 (1)(g), and rules promulgated thereunder, is in compliance with this part 10 so long as the waste characterization plan contains waste acceptance procedures to minimize the disposal of lead-acid batteries and used oil consistent with this part 10.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire part added, p. 1256, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2014:

(3) amended, (HB 14-1352), ch. 351, p. 1595, § 8, effective July 1.

30-20-1010. Violation - penalty.

Any person who violates any provision of this part 10 commits a civil infraction. Each day of violation shall be deemed a separate offense under this section.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire part added, p. 1256, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3249, § 508, effective March 1, 2022.